Utah statutes.
41-1a-1210.   Fees for original and duplicate certificates of title.

A fee of $6 shall be paid to the division for the issuance of each original and duplicate certificate of title for a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 222, 1993 General Session

